Utah statutes.
17-42-106.   Penalties.
(1) (a)  A person who knowingly commits any of the violations in Subsection
(2) is subject to a civil penalty of not less than $250 on a first violation
of Subsection (2), and a civil penalty of not less than $500 on any second or
subsequent violation of Subsection (2).
(b)  The administrator of the animal shelter imposes the civil penalties under
this section.
(2)  A person is subject to the civil penalties under Subsection (1) who:
(a)  falsifies any proof of sterilization submitted for the purpose of
compliance with this chapter;
(b)  provides to an animal shelter or a licensed veterinarian inaccurate
information regarding ownership of any animal required to be submitted for
sterilization under this chapter;
(c)  submits to an animal shelter false information regarding sterilization
fees or fee schedules; or
(d)  issues a check for insufficient funds for any sterilization deposit
required of the person under this chapter.
(3)  A person who contests a civil penalty imposed against him under this
section is entitled to an administrative hearing that provides for the
person's rights of due process.
(4)  All penalties collected under this section shall be retained by the
animal shelter imposing the penalties, to be used solely for the purposes
under Subsection 17-42-104(4).
